Massachusetts, session 194th, H3314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 268B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in the definition of “Amount”, by striking out “greater than
$1,000 but not more than $5,000; greater than $5,000 but not more than $10,000; greater than
$10,000 but not more than $20,000; greater than $20,000 but not more than $40,000; greater than
$40,000 but not more than $60,000; greater than $60,000 but not more than $100,000; greater
than $100,000” and inserting in place thereof the following words “rounded to the nearest
$10,000, or to the nearest $1,000 if less than $10,000”
Section 2. Section 3 of said chapter 268B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing subsection (d) with the following words:- make
statements and reports filed with the commission available for public inspection via download
online for free or for in person public inspection and copying during regular office hours upon
the written request of any individual, at a charge not to exceed the actual administrative and
of 2

material costs required in reproducing said statements and reports; provided, however, that the
commission may make statements and reports filed with the commission available by electronic
mail in a read-only format upon the written request of any individual that delivers the request by
electronic mail; provided, however, that the commission shall be authorized, in its discretion, to
exempt from public disclosure those portions of a statement of financial interest filed pursuant to
section five which contain the home address of the filer; and provided, further, that the
commission shall not notify the person whose statement has been examined.
Section 3. Subsection (g) of section 5 of said chapter 268B of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “fair market
value of greater than one thousand dollars”, and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
aggregate fair market value, with the value of an investment considered the sum of individual
units owned, of greater than one thousand dollars.
of 2